Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Part IUse of Local Real Estate Excise Tax RevenuesSec. 101. RCW 82.46.035 and 2025 c 85 s 2 and 2025 c 159 s 5 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The legislative authority of any county or city must identify in the adopted budget the capital projects funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of the tax authorized in this section, and must indicate that such tax is intended to be in addition to other funds that may be reasonably available for such capital projects.(2) The legislative authority of any county or any city that plans under RCW 36.70A.040(1) may impose an additional excise tax on each sale of real property in the unincorporated areas of the county for the county tax and in the corporate limits of the city for the city tax at a rate not exceeding 0.25 percent of the selling price. Any county choosing to plan under RCW 36.70A.040(2) and any city within such a county may only adopt an ordinance imposing the excise tax authorized by this section if the ordinance is first authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition at a general election held within the district or at a special election within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the voters.(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, revenues generated from the tax imposed under subsection (2) of this section must be used by such counties and cities solely for capital projects specified in a capital facilities plan element of a comprehensive plan. However, revenues (a) pledged by such counties and cities to debt retirement prior to March 1, 1992, may continue to be used for that purpose until the original debt for which the revenues were pledged is retired, or (b) committed prior to March 1, 1992, by such counties or cities to a project may continue to be used for that purpose until the project is completed.(4) As used in this section, "city" means any city or town and "capital project" means those public works projects or public investments of a local government for:(a) Planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of streets, roads, highways, sidewalks, street and road lighting systems, traffic signals, bridges, domestic water systems, storm and sanitary sewer systems;(b) Planning, construction, reconstruction, repair, rehabilitation, or improvement of parks; (c)(i) Planning, construction, reconstruction, repair, rehabilitation, or improvement of either of the following categories of airports:(A) Airports included in the most recent Washington aviation system plan published by the Washington department of transportation aviation division; and(B) Airports included in the national plan of integrated airport systems with less than 10,000 annual enplanements as determined by the most recent enplanement data published by the federal aviation administration.(ii) "Capital project" does not include the installation or improvement of fuel systems for the distribution of leaded fuel at an airport as described in this subsection (5)(c); ((and))(d) Planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of facilities for those experiencing homelessness and affordable housing projects; ((and(d)))(e) Any use allowed under RCW 82.46.010; and(f) Abatement of nuisance properties.(5) Revenues generated by the tax imposed under subsection (2) of this section may be used towards planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of facilities for those experiencing homelessness and affordable housing projects that are supported through an interlocal housing collaboration as established under chapter 39.34 RCW.(6) A county or city may use the greater of $100,000 or 25 percent of available funds for capital projects as defined in subsection (4)(d) of this section. The limits in this subsection do not apply to any county or city that used revenue under this section for the acquisition, construction, improvement, or rehabilitation of facilities to provide housing for the homeless prior to June 30, 2019.(7) A county or city using funds for uses in subsection (4)(d) of this section must document in its plan under RCW 36.70A.070(3) that it has funds during the next two years for capital projects in subsection (4)(a) and (b) of this section.(8) When the governor files a notice of noncompliance under RCW 36.70A.340 with the secretary of state and the appropriate county or city, the county or city's authority to impose the additional excise tax under this section is temporarily rescinded until the governor files a subsequent notice rescinding the notice of noncompliance.Part IILocal Sales and Use Tax to Fund Services for Children and FamiliesNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 201. The legislature finds that providing additional services at the local level to get ahead of challenges that many individuals face, particularly children, in order to thrive is important for the success of the citizens of Washington.The legislature further finds that there are many services that are not addressed through current funding options, including medicaid and county behavioral health programs. Existing service gaps include crisis stabilization, children mental health therapies, prevention and early interventions, behavioral health modalities, and culturally appropriate models for smaller community-based organizations. Reaching children and their families early is one of the best ways to reduce long-term needs and make a difference in overall mental health status as well as reducing youth violence, drug use, and suicides.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 202. A new section is added to chapter 82.14 RCW to read as follows:(1) The legislative authority of a city or county may by resolution or ordinance impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The rate of the tax imposed by the city or county may not exceed 0.01 percent of the selling price, in the case of the sales tax, or the value of the article used, in the case of the use tax. This tax is in addition to other taxes authorized by law and must be collected from those persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the city or county.(2) Moneys collected under this section must be used solely for the purpose of providing additional services that assist children and their families, including: Child care; perinatal support services; before-school and after-school based youth services that address mental, social, behavioral, and physical health; workforce capacity building; shelter and rental assistance; and client transportation.(3) If the city adopts an ordinance or resolution to impose the sales and use tax under this subsection, the county in which the city is located must provide a credit against its tax under subsection (1) of this section for the city tax to the extent the total county and city tax rate under this section would exceed 0.01 percent.Part IIILocal Sales and Use Tax for Housing and Related ServicesSec. 301. RCW 82.14.530 and 2021 c 27 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a)(i) A county legislative authority may submit an authorizing proposition to the county voters at a special or general election and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which the proposed sales and use tax will be used. The rate of tax under this section may not exceed ((one-tenth of one))0.1 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.(ii) As an alternative to the authority provided in (a)(i) of this subsection, a county legislative authority may impose, without a proposition approved by a majority of persons voting, a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The rate of tax under this section may not exceed ((one-tenth of one))0.1 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.(b)(i) If a county does not impose the full tax rate authorized under (a) of this subsection by September 30, 2020, any city legislative authority located in that county may:(A) Submit an authorizing proposition to the city voters at a special or general election and, if the proposition is approved by a majority of persons voting, impose the whole or remainder of the sales and use tax rate in accordance with the terms of this chapter. The title of each ballot measure must clearly state the purposes for which the proposed sales and use tax will be used; or(B) Impose, without a proposition approved by a majority of persons voting, the whole or remainder of the sales and use tax rate in accordance with the terms of this chapter.(ii) The rate of tax under this section may not exceed ((one-tenth of one))0.1 percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.(iii) A county with a population of greater than ((one million five hundred thousand))1,500,000 may impose the tax authorized under (a)(ii) of this subsection only if the county plans to spend at least ((thirty))30 percent of the moneys collected under this section that are attributable to taxable activities or events within any city with a population greater than ((sixty thousand))60,000 located in that county within that city's boundaries.(c) If a county imposes a tax authorized under (a) of this subsection after a city located in that county has imposed the tax authorized under (b) of this subsection, the county must provide a credit against its tax for the full amount of tax imposed by a city.(d) The taxes authorized in this subsection are in addition to any other taxes authorized by law and must be collected from persons who are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW upon the occurrence of any taxable event within the county for a county's tax and within a city for a city's tax.(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section, a minimum of ((sixty))60 percent of the moneys collected under this section must be used for the following purposes:(i) Constructing or acquiring affordable housing, which may include emergency, transitional, and supportive housing and new units of affordable housing within an existing structure, and facilities providing housing-related services, or acquiring land for these purposes; or(ii) Constructing or acquiring behavioral health-related facilities, or acquiring land for these purposes; or(iii) Funding the operations and maintenance costs of new and existing units of affordable housing and facilities where housing-related programs are provided, or newly constructed evaluation and treatment centers; or(iv) Rehabilitating existing affordable housing, which may include emergency, transitional, and supportive housing.(b) The affordable housing and facilities providing housing-related programs in (a)(i) of this subsection may only be provided to persons within any of the following population groups whose income is at or below ((sixty))60 percent of the median income of the county imposing the tax:(i) Persons with behavioral health disabilities;(ii) Veterans;(iii) Senior citizens;(iv) Persons who are homeless or at-risk of being homeless, including families with children;(v) Unaccompanied homeless youth or young adults;(vi) Persons with disabilities; or(vii) Domestic violence survivors.(c) The remainder of the moneys collected under this section must be used for ((the)):(i) The operation, delivery, or evaluation of behavioral health treatment programs and services, affordable and supportive housing operation and maintenance, or housing-related services; or(ii) Rental assistance.(3)(a) A county that imposes the tax under this section must consult with a city before the county may construct or acquire any of the facilities authorized under subsection (2)(a) of this section within the city limits.(b) Among other priorities, a county that acquires a facility under subsection (2)(a) of this section must provide an opportunity for 15 percent of the units provided at that facility to be provided to individuals who are living in or near the city in which the facility is located, or have ties to that community. The provisions of this subsection (3)(b) do not apply if the county is unable to identify sufficient individuals within the city in need of services that meet the criteria provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section. This prioritization must not jeopardize United States department of housing and urban development funding for the continuum of care program.(4) A county that has not imposed the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.460 prior to October 9, 2015, but imposes the tax authorized under this section after a city in that county has imposed the tax authorized under RCW 82.14.460 prior to October 9, 2015, must enter into an interlocal agreement with that city to determine how the services and provisions described in subsection (2) of this section will be allocated and funded in the city.(5) To carry out the purposes of subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section, the legislative authority of the county or city imposing the tax has the authority to issue general obligation or revenue bonds within the limitations now or hereafter prescribed by the laws of this state, and may use, and is authorized to pledge, up to ((fifty))50 percent of the moneys collected under this section for repayment of such bonds, in order to finance the provision or construction of affordable housing, facilities where housing-related programs are provided, or evaluation and treatment centers described in subsection (2)(a)(iii) of this section.(6)(a) Moneys collected under this section may be used to offset reductions in state or federal funds for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section.(b) No more than ((ten))10 percent of the moneys collected under this section may be used to supplant existing local funds.(7) A county or city may enter into an interlocal agreement with one or more counties, cities, or public housing authorities in accordance with chapter 39.34 RCW. The agreement may include, but is not limited to, pooling the tax receipts received under this section, pledging those taxes to bonds issued by one or more parties to the agreement, and allocating the proceeds of the taxes levied or the bonds issued in accordance with such interlocal agreement and this section.Sec. 302. RCW 82.14.540 and 2024 c 136 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Nonparticipating city" is a city that does not impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(b) "Nonparticipating county" is a county that does not impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(c) "Participating city" is a city that imposes a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(d) "Participating county" is a county that imposes a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(e) "Qualifying local tax" means the following tax sources, if the tax source is instated no later than ((twelve))12 months after July 28, 2019:(i) The affordable housing levy authorized under RCW 84.52.105;(ii) The sales and use tax for housing and related services authorized under RCW 82.14.530, provided the city has imposed the tax at a minimum or of at least half of the authorized rate;(iii) The sales tax for chemical dependency and mental health treatment services or therapeutic courts authorized under RCW 82.14.460 imposed by a city; and(iv) The levy authorized under RCW 84.55.050, if used solely for affordable housing.(2)(a) A county or city legislative authority may authorize, fix, and impose a sales and use tax in accordance with the terms of this section.(b) The tax under this section is assessed on the selling price in the case of a sales tax, or value of the article used, in the case of a use tax.(c) The rate of the tax under this section for an individual participating city and an individual participating county may not exceed:(i) Beginning on July 28, 2019, until ((twelve))12 months after July 28, 2019:(A) 0.0073 percent for a:(I) Participating city, unless the participating city levies a qualifying local tax; and(II) Participating county, within the limits of nonparticipating cities within the county and within participating cities that do not currently levy a qualifying tax;(B) 0.0146 percent for a:(I) Participating city that currently levies a qualifying local tax;(II) Participating city if the county in which it is located declares they will not levy the sales and use tax authorized under this section or does not adopt a resolution in accordance with this section; and(III) Participating county within the unincorporated areas of the county and any city that declares they will not levy the sales and use tax authorized under this section or does not adopt a resolution in accordance with this section;(ii) Beginning ((twelve))12 months after July 28, 2019:(A) 0.0073 percent for a:(I) Participating city that is located within a participating county if the participating city is not levying a qualifying local tax; and(II) Participating county, within the limits of a participating city if the participating city is not levying a qualifying local tax;(B) 0.0146 percent within the limits of a:(I) Participating city that is levying a qualifying local tax; and(II) Participating county within the unincorporated area of the county and within the limits of any nonparticipating city that is located within the county.(d) A county may not levy the tax authorized under this section within the limits of a participating city that levies a qualifying local tax.(e)(i) In order for a county or city legislative authority to impose the tax under this section, the authority must adopt:(A) A resolution of intent to adopt legislation to authorize the maximum capacity of the tax in this section within six months of July 28, 2019; and(B) Legislation to authorize the maximum capacity of the tax in this section within one year of July 28, 2019.(ii) Adoption of the resolution of intent and legislation requires simple majority approval of the enacting legislative authority.(iii) If a county or city has not adopted a resolution of intent in accordance with the terms of this section, the county or city may not authorize, fix, and impose the tax.(3) The tax imposed under this section must be deducted from the amount of tax otherwise required to be collected or paid to the department of revenue under chapter 82.08 or 82.12 RCW. The department must perform the collection of such taxes on behalf of the county or city at no cost to the county or city.(4) By December 31, 2019, or within thirty days of a county or city authorizing the tax under this section, whichever is later, the department must calculate the maximum amount of tax distributions for each county and city authorizing the tax under this section as follows:(a) The maximum amount for a participating county equals the taxable retail sales within the county in state fiscal year 2019 multiplied by the tax rate imposed under this section. If a county imposes a tax authorized under this section after a city located in that county has imposed the tax, the taxable retail sales within the city in state fiscal year 2019 must be subtracted from the taxable retail sales within the county for the calculation of the maximum amount; and(b) The maximum amount for a city equals the taxable retail sales within the city in state fiscal year 2019 multiplied by the tax rate imposed under subsection (1) of this section.(5) The tax must cease to be distributed to a county or city for the remainder of any fiscal year in which the amount of tax exceeds the maximum amount in subsection (4) of this section. The department must remit any annual tax revenues above the maximum to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund. Distributions to a county or city meeting the maximum amount must resume at the beginning of the next fiscal year.(6)(a) The moneys collected or bonds issued under this section may only be used for the following purposes:(i) Acquiring, rehabilitating, or constructing affordable housing, which may include new units of affordable housing within an existing structure or facilities providing supportive housing services under RCW 71.24.385;(ii) Funding the operations and maintenance costs of new and existing units of affordable or supportive housing; or(iii) For providing rental assistance to tenants.(b) Administrative costs of the county or city associated with administering this section may not exceed 10 percent of the annual tax distributed to the jurisdiction under this section.(7) The housing and services provided pursuant to subsection (6) of this section may only be provided to persons whose income is at or below 60 percent of the median income of the county or city imposing the tax, or at or below 80 percent of the median income of the county or city imposing the tax if it is supporting the development of affordable housing intended for owner occupancy, as defined in RCW 84.14.010.(8) In determining the use of funds under subsection (6) of this section, a county or city must consider the income of the individuals and families to be served, the leveraging of the resources made available under this section, and the housing needs within the jurisdiction of the taxing authority.(9) To carry out the purposes of this section including, but not limited to, financing loans or grants to nonprofit organizations or public housing authorities, the legislative authority of the county or city imposing the tax has the authority to issue general obligation or revenue bonds within the limitations now or hereafter prescribed by the laws of this state, and may use, and is authorized to pledge, the moneys collected under this section for repayment of such bonds.(10) A county or city may enter into an interlocal agreement with one or more counties, cities, or public housing authorities in accordance with chapter 39.34 RCW. The agreement may include, but is not limited to, pooling the tax receipts received under this section, pledging those taxes to bonds issued by one or more parties to the agreement, and allocating the proceeds of the taxes levied or the bonds issued in accordance with such interlocal agreement and this section.(11) Counties and cities imposing the tax under this section must report annually to the department of commerce on the collection and use of the revenue. The department of commerce must adopt rules prescribing content of such reports. By December 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the department of commerce must submit a report annually to the appropriate legislative committees with regard to such uses.(12) The tax imposed by a county or city under this section expires ((twenty))20 years after the date on which the tax is first imposed.Part IVProperty Tax ProrationingSec. 401. RCW 84.52.043 and 2024 c 361 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts hereafter named are as follows:(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts are as follows: (a) The levies by the state may not exceed the applicable aggregate rate limit specified in RCW 84.52.065 (2) or (4) adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county may not exceed $1.80 per $1,000 of assessed value; (c) the levy by any county pursuant to RCW 73.08.080(1)(b)(i) may not exceed 27 cents per $1,000 of assessed value or be less than 1.125 cents per $1,000 of assessed value; (d) the levy by any county pursuant to RCW 71.20.110(1)(b)(i) may not exceed 2.5 cents per $1,000 of assessed value; (e) the levy by any road district may not exceed $2.25 per $1,000 of assessed value; and (((d)))(f) the levy by any city or town may not exceed $3.375 per $1,000 of assessed value. However, any county is hereby authorized to increase its levy from $1.80 to a rate not to exceed $2.475 per $1,000 of assessed value for general county purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road district within the county do not exceed $4.05 per $1,000 of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as a result of the increased county levy.(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts, other than the state, may not exceed $5.90 per $1,000 of assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection do not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW 84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f) the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies imposed by ferry districts under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies for criminal justice purposes under RCW 84.52.135; (i) the portions of levies by fire protection districts and regional fire protection service authorities that are protected under RCW 84.52.125; (j) levies by counties for transit-related purposes under RCW 84.52.140; (k) the portion of the levy by flood control zone districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.816; (l) levies imposed by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.104.175; (m) levies imposed by any park and recreation district described under RCW 84.52.010(3)(a)(viii); (n) levies for county public health clinic operations, maintenance, and capital expenses under section 801(2)(a) of this act; (o) levies for veterans' assistance under RCW 73.08.080(1)(b)(i); (p) levies for developmental disabilities or mental health services under RCW 71.20.110(1)(b)(i); (q) the portion of the levies for fire protection districts under RCW 52.02.160 that are protected under RCW 84.52.125; (r) the portion of any levy resulting from the correction of a levy error under RCW 84.52.085(3); and (((o)))(s) levies for county hospital purposes under RCW 36.62.090.Sec. 402. RCW 84.52.043 and 2024 c 361 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:Within and subject to the limitations imposed by RCW 84.52.050 as amended, the regular ad valorem tax levies upon real and personal property by the taxing districts hereafter named are as follows:(1) Levies of the senior taxing districts are as follows: (a) The levies by the state may not exceed the applicable aggregate rate limit specified in RCW 84.52.065 (2) or (4) adjusted to the state equalized value in accordance with the indicated ratio fixed by the state department of revenue to be used exclusively for the support of the common schools; (b) the levy by any county may not exceed $1.80 per $1,000 of assessed value; (c) the levy by any county pursuant to RCW 73.08.080(1)(b)(i) may not exceed 27 cents per $1,000 of assessed value or be less than 1.125 cents per $1,000 of assessed value; (d) the levy by any county pursuant to RCW 71.20.110(1)(b)(i) may not exceed 2.5 cents per $1,000 of assessed value; (e) the levy by any road district may not exceed $2.25 per $1,000 of assessed value; and (((d)))(f) the levy by any city or town may not exceed $3.375 per $1,000 of assessed value. However any county is hereby authorized to increase its levy from $1.80 to a rate not to exceed $2.475 per $1,000 of assessed value for general county purposes if the total levies for both the county and any road district within the county do not exceed $4.05 per $1,000 of assessed value, and no other taxing district has its levy reduced as a result of the increased county levy.(2) The aggregate levies of junior taxing districts and senior taxing districts, other than the state, may not exceed $5.90 per $1,000 of assessed valuation. The term "junior taxing districts" includes all taxing districts other than the state, counties, road districts, cities, towns, port districts, and public utility districts. The limitations provided in this subsection do not apply to: (a) Levies at the rates provided by existing law by or for any port or public utility district; (b) excess property tax levies authorized in Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution; (c) levies for acquiring conservation futures as authorized under RCW 84.34.230; (d) levies for emergency medical care or emergency medical services imposed under RCW 84.52.069; (e) levies to finance affordable housing imposed under RCW 84.52.105; (f) the portions of levies by metropolitan park districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.120; (g) levies imposed by ferry districts under RCW 36.54.130; (h) levies for criminal justice purposes under RCW 84.52.135; (i) the portions of levies by fire protection districts and regional fire protection service authorities that are protected under RCW 84.52.125; (j) levies by counties for transit-related purposes under RCW 84.52.140; (k) the portion of the levy by flood control zone districts that are protected under RCW 84.52.816; (l) levies imposed by a regional transit authority under RCW 81.104.175; (m) the portion of any levy resulting from the correction of a levy error under RCW 84.52.085(3); ((and)) (n) levies for county public health clinic operations, maintenance, and capital expenses under section 801(2)(a) of this act; (o) levies for veterans' assistance under RCW 73.08.080(1)(b)(i); (p) levies for developmental disabilities or mental health services under RCW 71.20.110(1)(b)(i); (q) the portion of the levies for fire protection districts under RCW 52.02.160 that are protected under RCW 84.52.125; and (r) levies for county hospital purposes under RCW 36.62.090.Sec. 403. RCW 84.52.010 and 2024 c 361 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes must be levied or voted in specific amounts.(2) The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, must be determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county must be determined, calculated, and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts respectively.(3) When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor must recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:(a) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district, regional transit authority, and city or town purposes must be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law; however, any state levy takes precedence over all other levies and may not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130, 36.69.145 by a park and recreation district described under (a)(viii) of this subsection (3), 73.08.080(1)(b)(i), 71.20.110(1)(b)(i), 84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, 36.62.090, section 801(2)(a) of this act, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, 84.52.125, 84.52.135, and 84.52.140, the portion of the levy by a flood control zone district that was protected under RCW 84.52.816, and any portion of a levy resulting from the correction of a levy error under RCW 84.52.085(3), the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these levies must be reduced as follows:(i) The portion of any levy resulting from the correction of a levy error under RCW 84.52.085(3) must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(ii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a flood control zone district that was protected under RCW 84.52.816 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(iii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.140 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(iv) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a fire protection district or regional fire protection service authority that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(v) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(vi) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(vii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(viii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW 36.69.145 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated. This subsection (3)(a)(viii) only applies to a park and recreation district located on an island and within a county with a population exceeding 2,000,000;(ix) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, 36.62.090, section 801(2)(a) of this act, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of 30 cents per $1,000 of assessed value, must be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated; ((and))(x) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the 30 cents per $1,000 of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or eliminated;(xi) If the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for veterans' assistance under RCW 73.08.080(1)(b)(i) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and(xii) If the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for developmental disabilities or mental health services under RCW 71.20.110(1)(b)(i) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.(b) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property must be reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:(i) First, the certified property tax levy authorized under RCW 84.52.821 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;(ii) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145 except a park and recreation district described under (a)(viii) of this subsection, 35.95A.100, and 67.38.130 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;(iii) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts other than the portion of a levy protected under RCW 84.52.816 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;(iv) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire protection service authorities, library districts, the first 50 cents per $1,000 of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the first 50 cents per $1,000 of assessed valuation levies for public hospital districts, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;(v) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the first 50 cents per $1,000 of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after January 1, 2002, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;(vi) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and(vii) Seventh, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts, metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their first 50 cents per $1,000 of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital districts under their first 50 cents per $1,000 of assessed valuation levy, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.Sec. 404. RCW 84.52.010 and 2024 c 361 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as is permitted under RCW 84.55.050, all taxes must be levied or voted in specific amounts.(2) The rate percent of all taxes for state and county purposes, and purposes of taxing districts coextensive with the county, must be determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the county, as shown by the completed tax rolls of the county, and the rate percent of all taxes levied for purposes of taxing districts within any county must be determined, calculated and fixed by the county assessors of the respective counties, within the limitations provided by law, upon the assessed valuation of the property of the taxing districts respectively.(3) When a county assessor finds that the aggregate rate of tax levy on any property, that is subject to the limitations set forth in RCW 84.52.043 or 84.52.050, exceeds the limitations provided in either of these sections, the assessor must recompute and establish a consolidated levy in the following manner:(a) The full certified rates of tax levy for state, county, county road district, regional transit authority, and city or town purposes must be extended on the tax rolls in amounts not exceeding the limitations established by law; however any state levy takes precedence over all other levies and may not be reduced for any purpose other than that required by RCW 84.55.010. If, as a result of the levies imposed under RCW 36.54.130, 73.08.080(1)(b)(i), 71.20.110(1)(b)(i), 84.34.230, 84.52.069, 84.52.105, 36.62.090, section 801(2)(a) of this act, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that was protected under RCW 84.52.120, 84.52.125, 84.52.135, and 84.52.140, the portion of the levy by a flood control zone district that was protected under RCW 84.52.816, and the portion of any levy resulting from the correction of a levy error under RCW 84.52.085(3), the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then these levies must be reduced as follows:(i) The portion of any levy resulting from the correction of a levy error under RCW 84.52.085(3) must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(ii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a flood control zone district that was protected under RCW 84.52.816 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(iii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.140 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(iv) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a fire protection district or regional fire protection service authority that is protected under RCW 84.52.125 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(v) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a county under RCW 84.52.135 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(vi) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, the levy imposed by a ferry district under RCW 36.54.130 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(vii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, the portion of the levy by a metropolitan park district that is protected under RCW 84.52.120 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated;(viii) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the levies imposed under RCW 84.34.230, 84.52.105, 36.62.090, section 801(2)(a) of this act, and any portion of the levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 that is in excess of 30 cents per $1,000 of assessed value, must be reduced on a pro rata basis until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or must be eliminated; ((and))(ix) If the combined rate of regular property tax levies that are subject to the one percent limitation still exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property, then the 30 cents per $1,000 of assessed value of tax levy imposed under RCW 84.52.069 must be reduced until the combined rate no longer exceeds one percent of the true and fair value of any property or eliminated;(x) If the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for veterans' assistance under RCW 73.08.080(1)(b)(i) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and(xi) If the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for developmental disabilities or mental health services under RCW 71.20.110(1)(b)(i) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.(b) The certified rates of tax levy subject to these limitations by all junior taxing districts imposing taxes on such property must be reduced or eliminated as follows to bring the consolidated levy of taxes on such property within the provisions of these limitations:(i) First, the certified property tax levy authorized under RCW 84.52.821 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;(ii) Second, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of those junior taxing districts authorized under RCW 36.68.525, 36.69.145, 35.95A.100, and 67.38.130 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;(iii) Third, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of flood control zone districts other than the portion of a levy protected under RCW 84.52.816 must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;(iv) Fourth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates of all other junior taxing districts, other than fire protection districts, regional fire protection service authorities, library districts, the first 50 cents per $1,000 of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts, and the first 50 cents per $1,000 of assessed valuation levies for public hospital districts, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;(v) Fifth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the first 50 cents per $1,000 of assessed valuation levies for metropolitan park districts created on or after January 1, 2002, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated;(vi) Sixth, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized to fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160 and regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c) must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated; and(vii) Seventh, if the consolidated tax levy rate still exceeds these limitations, the certified property tax levy rates authorized for fire protection districts under RCW 52.16.130, regional fire protection service authorities under RCW 52.26.140(1)(a), library districts, metropolitan park districts created before January 1, 2002, under their first 50 cents per $1,000 of assessed valuation levy, and public hospital districts under their first 50 cents per $1,000 of assessed valuation levy, must be reduced on a pro rata basis or eliminated.Part VExceeding Regular Property Tax Levy LimitationsSec. 501. RCW 84.55.050 and 2024 c 114 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Subject to any otherwise applicable statutory dollar rate limitations, regular property taxes may be levied by or for a taxing district in an amount exceeding the limitations provided for in this chapter if such levy is authorized by a proposition approved by a majority of the voters of the taxing district voting on the proposition at a general election held within the district or at a special election within the taxing district called by the district for the purpose of submitting such proposition to the voters. Any election held pursuant to this section shall be held not more than 12 months prior to the date on which the proposed levy, or the first of the two consecutive levies, is to be made, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section. The ballot of the proposition shall state the dollar rate or rates, proposed for each year, up to two consecutive years, and shall clearly state the conditions, if any, which are applicable under subsection (4) of this section.(2) Subject to statutory dollar limitations, a proposition placed before the voters under this section may authorize annual increases in levies for multiple consecutive years, up to ((six))10 consecutive years, during which period each year's authorized maximum legal levy shall be used as the base upon which an increased levy limit for the succeeding year is computed, but the ballot proposition must state the dollar rate proposed only for the first year of the consecutive years and must state the limit factor, or a specified index to be used for determining a limit factor, such as the consumer price index, which need not be the same for all years, by which the regular tax levy for the district may be increased in each of the subsequent consecutive years. Elections for this purpose must be held at a primary or general election. The title of each ballot measure must state the limited purposes for which the proposed annual increases during the specified period of up to ((six))10 consecutive years shall be used.(3) After a levy authorized pursuant to this section is made, the dollar amount of such levy may not be used for the purpose of computing the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter, unless the ballot proposition expressly states that the levy made under this section will be used for this purpose.(4) If expressly stated, a proposition placed before the voters under subsection (1) or (2) of this section may:(a) Use the dollar amount of ((a))the final levy under subsection (1) of this section, or the dollar amount of the final levy under subsection (2) of this section, for the purpose of computing the limitations for subsequent levies provided for in this chapter;(b) Limit the period for which the increased levy is to be made under (a) of this subsection;(c) Limit the purpose for which the increased levy is to be made under (a) of this subsection, but if the limited purpose includes making redemption payments on bonds;(i) For the county in which the state capitol is located, the period for which the increased levies are made may not exceed 25 years; and(ii) For districts other than a district under (c)(i) of this subsection, the period for which the increased levies are made may not exceed nine years;(d) Set the levy or levies at a rate less than the maximum rate allowed for the district;(e) Provide that the exemption authorized by RCW 84.36.381 will apply to the levy of any additional regular property taxes authorized by voters; or(f) Include any combination of the conditions in this subsection.(5) Except as otherwise expressly stated in an approved ballot measure under this section, subsequent levies shall be computed as if:(a) The proposition under this section had not been approved; and(b) The taxing district had made levies at the maximum rates which would otherwise have been allowed under this chapter during the years levies were made under the proposition.Part VISales Tax on Rental CarsSec. 601. RCW 82.14.049 and 2020 c 139 s 23 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The legislative authority of any county may impose a sales and use tax, in addition to the tax authorized by RCW 82.14.030, upon retail car rentals within the county that are taxable by the state under chapters 82.08 and 82.12 RCW. The rate of tax is one percent of the selling price in the case of a sales tax or rental value of the vehicle in the case of a use tax. Proceeds of the tax may not be used to subsidize any professional sports team and must be used solely for the following purposes:(a) Acquiring, constructing, maintaining, or operating public sports stadium facilities;(b) Engineering, planning, financial, legal, or professional services incidental to public sports stadium facilities;(c) Youth or amateur sport activities or facilities; ((or))(d) Debt or refinancing debt issued for the purposes of subsection (1) of this section; or(e) Criminal justice purposes as defined in RCW 82.14.345.(2) In a county of ((one million))1,000,000 or more, at least ((seventy-five))75 percent of the tax imposed under this section must be used to retire the debt on the stadium under RCW 67.28.180(2)(b)(i)(B), until that debt is fully retired.Part VIIFlood Control Zone Districts Recovery AssistanceSec. 701. RCW 86.15.080 and 2010 c 46 s 2 are each amended to read as follows:A zone or participating zone may:(1) Exercise all the powers and immunities vested in a county for flood water or stormwater control purposes under the provisions of chapters 86.12, 86.13, 36.89, and 36.94 RCW: PROVIDED, That in exercising such powers, all actions shall be taken in the name of the zone and title to all property or property rights shall vest in the zone;(2) Plan, construct, acquire, repair, maintain, and operate all necessary equipment, facilities, improvements, and works to control, conserve, and remove flood waters and stormwaters and to otherwise carry out the purposes of this chapter including, but not limited to, protection of the quality of water sources;(3) Take action necessary to protect life and property within the district from flood water damage, including in the context of an emergency, as defined in RCW 38.52.010, using covered volunteer emergency workers, as defined in RCW 38.52.010 and 38.52.180(5)(a), subject to and in accordance with the terms of RCW 38.52.180;(4) Control, conserve, retain, reclaim, and remove flood waters and stormwaters, including waters of lakes and ponds within the district, and dispose of the same for beneficial or useful purposes under such terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate, subject to the acquisition by the board of appropriate water rights in accordance with the statutes;(5) Acquire necessary property, property rights, facilities, and equipment necessary to the purposes of the zone by purchase, gift, or condemnation: PROVIDED, That property of municipal corporations may not be acquired without the consent of such municipal corporation;(6) Sue and be sued in the name of the zone;(7) Acquire or reclaim lands when incidental to the purposes of the zone and dispose of such lands as are surplus to the needs of the zone in the manner provided for the disposal of county property in chapter 36.34 RCW;(8) Cooperate with or join with the state of Washington, United States, another state, any agency, corporation or political subdivision of the United States or any state, Canada, or any private corporation or individual for the purposes of this chapter;(9) Accept funds or property by loan, grant, gift or otherwise from the United States, the state of Washington, or any other public or private source;(10) Remove debris, logs, or other material which may impede the orderly flow of waters in streams or water courses: PROVIDED, That such material shall become property of the zone and may be sold for the purpose of recovering the cost of removal: PROVIDED FURTHER, That valuable material or minerals removed from public lands shall remain the property of the state;(11) Provide grant funds to political subdivisions of the state that are located within the boundaries of the zone, so long as the use of the grant funds is within the purposes authorized under this chapter;(12) Expend funds, or transfer funds to the county legislative authority in which the zone is located, for the purpose of providing county-administered flood recovery assistance to households and businesses damaged by a flood event occurring within the zone that is the subject of an emergency proclamation issued by the governor under RCW 43.06.010.Part VIIICounty Public Health Clinic Property TaxNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 801. A new section is added to chapter 84.52 RCW to read as follows:(1) A county, at the time of levying general taxes, may levy an additional regular property tax, not to exceed five cents per $1,000 of assessed value in any one year, in accordance with this section.(2) The legislative authority of a county imposing this levy must either:(a) Impose the levy as a separate levy, independent of the regular property tax levy authorized in RCW 84.52.043(1)(b); or(b) Impose the levy as part of its levy authorized in RCW 84.52.043(1)(b).(3) Any tax imposed under this section may only be used for the operation, maintenance, and capital expenses of public health clinics.(4) The limitations in RCW 84.52.043 do not apply to the tax levy authorized in this section and the limitation in RCW 84.55.010 does not apply to the first year the tax levy is imposed under this section.(5) For the purposes of this section, "public health clinic" means a fixed or mobile, publicly operated site for the provision of low-barrier public health and other related services including, but not limited to: Primary, dental, and reproductive health care; treatment, control, and prevention of communicable diseases, substance use disorder, and other health conditions; maternal, infant, child, and family health and nutrition; behavioral health care; assistance with health plan enrollment; and access and referrals to other community services.Part IXVeterans' Assistance Property Tax Levy and the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Assistance Property Tax LevySec. 901. RCW 71.20.110 and 2013 c 123 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) In order to provide additional funds for the coordination and provision of community services for persons with developmental disabilities or mental health services, the county governing authority of each county in the state must ((budget and)) levy annually a tax in a sum equal to ((the amount which would be raised by a levy of two and one-half))2.5 cents per ((thousand dollars))$1,000 of assessed value against the taxable property in the county((, or as such amount is modified pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) of this section,)) to be used for such purposes. ((However, all))(b) The levy required in this section must be:(i) Imposed by the legislative authority of the county as a separate levy, independent of the regular property tax levy authorized in RCW 84.52.043(1)(b); or(ii) Imposed by the legislative authority of the county as part of its levy authorized in RCW 84.52.043(1)(b).(2) All or part of the funds collected from the tax levied for the purposes of this section may be transferred to the state of Washington, department of social and health services, for the purpose of obtaining federal matching funds to provide and coordinate community services for persons with developmental disabilities and mental health services. In the event a county elects to transfer such tax funds to the state for this purpose, the state must grant these moneys and the additional funds received as matching funds to service-providing community agencies or community boards in the county which has made such transfer, pursuant to the plan approved by the county, as provided by chapters 71.24 and 71.28 RCW and by chapter 71A.14 RCW, all as now or hereafter amended.(((2) The amount of a levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section may be reduced in the same proportion as the regular property tax levy of the county is reduced by chapter 84.55 RCW.(3)(a) The amount of a levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section may be modified from the amount required by subsection (1) of this section as follows:(i) If the certified levy is reduced from the preceding year's certified levy, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section may be reduced by no more than the same percentage as the certified levy is reduced from the preceding year's certified levy;(ii) If the certified levy is increased from the preceding year's certified levy, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section must be increased from the amount of the levy so allocated in the previous year by at least the same percentage as the certified levy is increased from the preceding year's certified levy. However, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section does not have to be increased under this subsection (3)(a)(ii) for the portion of a certified levy increase resulting from a voter-approved increase under RCW 84.55.050 that is dedicated to a specific purpose; or(iii) If the certified levy is unchanged from the preceding year's certified levy, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section must be equal to or greater than the amount of the levy so allocated in the preceding year.(b) For purposes of this subsection, "certified levy" means the property tax levy for general county purposes certified to the county assessor as required by RCW 84.52.070, excluding any amounts certified under chapters 84.69 and 84.68 RCW.(4) Subsections (2) and (3) of this section do not preclude a county from increasing the levy amount in subsection (1) of this section to an amount that is greater than the change in the regular county levy.))Sec. 902. RCW 73.08.080 and 2019 c 432 s 35 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The legislative authority in each county must levy, in addition to the taxes now levied by law, a tax in a sum equal to the amount that would be raised by not less than ((one and one-eighth))1.125 cents per ((thousand dollars))$1,000 of assessed value, and not greater than ((twenty-seven))27 cents per ((thousand dollars))$1,000 of assessed value against the taxable property of their respective counties, to be levied and collected as now prescribed by law for the assessment and collection of taxes, for the purpose of creating a veterans' assistance fund.(b) The levy required in this section must be:(i) Imposed by the legislative authority of the county as a separate levy, independent of the regular property tax levy authorized in RCW 84.52.043(1)(b); or(ii) Imposed by the legislative authority of the county as part of its levy authorized in RCW 84.52.043(1)(b).(2) Expenditures from the veterans' assistance fund, and interest earned on balances from the fund, may be used only for:(a) The veterans' assistance programs authorized by RCW 73.08.010;(b) The lawful disposition of the remains as defined in RCW 68.04.020 of a deceased indigent veteran or deceased family member of an indigent veteran as authorized by RCW 73.08.070; and(c) The direct and indirect costs incurred in the administration of the fund as authorized by subsection (((2)))(3) of this section.(((2)))(3) If the funds on deposit in the veterans' assistance fund, less outstanding warrants, on the first Tuesday in September exceeds((the lesser of)) the expected yield of ((one and one-eighth))1.125 cents per ((thousand dollars))$1,000 of assessed value against the taxable property of the county ((or the expected yield of a levy determined as set forth in subsection (5) of this section)), the county legislative authority may levy a lesser amount than would otherwise be required under subsection (1) ((or (5))) of this section.(((3)))(4) The direct and indirect costs incurred in the administration of the veterans' assistance fund must be computed by the county auditor, or the chief financial officer in a county operating under a charter, not less than annually. Following the computation of these direct and indirect costs, an amount equal to these costs may then be transferred from the veterans' assistance fund to the county current expense fund.(((4) The amount of a levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section may be reduced in the same proportion as the regular property tax levy of the county is reduced by chapter 84.55 RCW.(5)(a) The amount of a levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section may be modified from the amount required by subsection (1) of this section as follows:(i) If the certified levy is reduced from the preceding year's certified levy, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section may be reduced by no more than the same percentage as the certified levy is reduced from the preceding year's certified levy;(ii) If the certified levy is increased from the preceding year's certified levy, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section may not be less than the base allocation increased by the same percentage as the certified levy is increased from the preceding year's certified levy. However, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section does not have to be increased under this subsection (5)(a)(ii) for the portion of a certified levy increase resulting from a voter-approved increase under RCW 84.55.050 that is dedicated to a specific purpose; or(iii) If the certified levy is unchanged from the preceding year's certified levy, the amount of the levy allocated to the purposes specified in this section must be equal to or greater than the base allocation.(b) For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions apply:(i) "Base allocation" means the most recent allocation that was not reduced under subsection (2) of this section.(ii) "Certified levy" means the property tax levy for general county purposes certified to the county assessor as required by RCW 84.52.070, excluding any amounts certified under chapters 84.69 and 84.68 RCW.(6) Subsections (2), (4), and (5) of this section do not preclude a county from increasing the levy amount in subsection (1) of this section to an amount that is greater than the change in the regular county levy.))Sec. 903. RCW 84.55.005 and 2014 c 97 s 316 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Inflation" means the percentage change in the implicit price deflator for personal consumption expenditures for the United States as published for the most recent twelve-month period by the bureau of economic analysis of the federal department of commerce by September 25th of the year before the taxes are payable;(2) "Limit factor" means:(a) For taxing districts with a population of less than ten thousand in the calendar year prior to the assessment year, one hundred one percent;(b) For taxing districts for which a limit factor is authorized under RCW 84.55.0101, the lesser of the limit factor authorized under that section or one hundred one percent;(c) For the veterans' assistance levy under RCW 73.08.080(1)(b)(i), the lesser of 101 percent or 100 percent plus inflation, except in a county with a population less than 10,000, then 101 percent;(d) For the developmental disabilities and mental health services levy under RCW 71.20.110(1)(b)(i), the lesser of 101 percent or 100 percent plus inflation, except in a county with a population less than 10,000, then 101 percent;(e) For the county public health clinic property tax levy under section 801(2)(a) of this act, the lesser of 101 percent or 100 percent plus inflation, except in a county with a population less than 10,000, then 101 percent; and(f) For all other districts, the lesser of one hundred one percent or one hundred percent plus inflation; and(3) "Regular property taxes" has the meaning given it in RCW 84.04.140.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 904. Sections 401 through 404 and 901 through 903 of this act apply to taxes levied for collection in 2027 and thereafter.Part XFire Protection DistrictsSec. 1001. RCW 52.02.160 and 2017 c 328 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) As an alternative to the petition method of formation for fire protection districts provided in this chapter, the legislative authority of a city or town may by resolution, subject to the approval of the voters, establish a fire protection district with boundaries that are the same as the corporate boundaries of the city or town for the provision of fire prevention services, fire suppression services, and emergency medical services, and for the protection of life and property within the city or town.(a) Any resolution adopted by a city or town under this section to establish a fire protection district must, at a minimum:(i) Contain a financing plan for the fire protection district. As part of the financing plan, the city or town may propose the imposition of revenue sources authorized by this title for fire protection districts, such as property taxes, as provided in chapter 52.16 RCW, or benefit charges, as provided in chapter 52.18 RCW; and(ii) Set a date for a public hearing on the resolution.(b) The financing plan in the resolution adopted by the city or town must contain the following information regarding property taxes that will be imposed by the fire protection district and city or town subsequent to the formation of the district:(i) The dollar amount the fire protection district will levy in the first year in which the fire protection district imposes any of the regular property taxes in RCW 52.16.130, 52.16.140, or 52.16.160;(ii) ((The))If the fire protection district is formed prior to July 1, 2026, the city's or town's highest lawful levy for the purposes of RCW 84.55.092, reduced by the fire protection district's levy amount from (b)(i) of this subsection. This reduced highest lawful levy becomes the city's or town's highest lawful levy since 1986 for subsequent levy limit calculations under chapter 84.55 RCW; and(iii) The estimated aggregate net dollar amount impact on property owners within the city or town based on the ((changes described in (b)(i) and (ii) of this subsection (1)))levy rate including, if the fire protection district is formed prior to July 1, 2026, the city's or town's levy reduction described in (b)(ii) of this subsection.(c) If a city or town proposes the initial imposition of a benefit charge as a revenue source for the fire protection district under (a) of this subsection, the resolution adopted by the city or town must comply with the requirements of RCW 52.18.030.(d) Notice of public hearing on a resolution adopted by a city or town must be published on a city website or local newspaper for three consecutive weeks ((in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town)), and must be posted for at least fifteen days prior to the date of the hearing in three public places within the boundaries of the proposed fire protection district. Additional notice of the hearing may be given by mail, or in any manner the city legislative authorities deem necessary to notify affected persons. All notices must contain the time, date, and place of the public hearing.(e) Prior to adopting a resolution under this section, the legislative authority of the city or town must:(i) Include labor organizations representing employees who perform fire prevention, fire suppression, and emergency medical services within the city or town, to consult on development of the proposed financing plan, governance structure, and anticipated impacts on service delivery and employment conditions; and(ii) If the city or town is located within the boundaries of a public hospital district, the city or town must consult with the public hospital district on any impact of the financing plan on the public hospital district property tax levy.(2)(a) A resolution adopted under this section is not effective unless approved by the voters of the city or town at a general election. The resolution must be approved:(i) By a simple majority of the voters of the city or town; or(ii) If the resolution proposes the initial imposition of a benefit charge, by sixty percent of the voters of the city or town.(b) An election to approve or reject a resolution forming a fire protection district, including the proposed financial plan and any imposition of revenue sources for the fire protection district, must be conducted by the election officials of the county or counties in which the proposed district is located in accordance with the general election laws of the state. If a resolution forming a fire protection district provides that the fire protection district will be governed by a board of independently elected fire commissioners, as permitted under RCW 52.14.140, then the initial independently elected fire commissioners must be elected at the same election where the resolution is submitted to the voters authorizing the creation of the fire protection district. The election must be held at the next general election date, according to RCW 29A.04.321 and 29A.04.330, occurring after the date of the public hearing on the resolution adopted by the city or town legislative authority. The ballot title must include the information regarding property taxes that is required to be in the financing plan of the resolution under subsection (1)(b) of this section.(c) If a ballot proposition on the resolution is approved by voters, as provided in (a) of this subsection, the county legislative authority shall by resolution declare the fire protection district organized under the name designated in the ballot proposition.(d) Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed to alter a municipal airport fire department or affect any powers authorized under RCW 14.08.120(((2))). If a question arises as to whether this chapter modifies the affairs of municipal airports in any way, the answer is no.(3) ((A))(a) For any fire protection district formed under this section prior to July 1, 2026, a city or town must reduce its general fund regular property tax levy by the total combined levy of the fire protection district as proposed by the district in accordance with subsection (1)(b)(i) of this section. The reduced levy amount of the city or town must occur in the first year in which the fire protection district imposes any of the property taxes in RCW 52.16.130, 52.16.140, or 52.16.160 and must be specified in the financing plan and ballot proposition as provided in this section. If the fire protection district does not impose all three levies under RCW 52.16.130, 52.16.140, and 52.16.160 when it begins operations, the city must further reduce its general fund regular property tax levy if the district initially imposes any of the levies in subsequent years, by the amount of such levy or levies initially imposed in a subsequent year.(b) For any fire protection district formed under this section on or after July 1, 2026, for the city or town participating in the fire protection district, with the exception of cities over 500,000 in population as of 2025, the regular levies of the city or town may not exceed the applicable rates provided in RCW 27.12.390, 52.04.081, and 84.52.043(1) less the aggregate rates of any regular levies made by the district under RCW 52.16.130, 52.16.140, or 52.16.160.Sec. 1002. RCW 52.02.180 and 2017 c 328 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as provided otherwise in the resolution adopted by the legislative authority of a city or town establishing a fire protection district under RCW 52.02.160, all powers, duties, and functions of the city or town fire department pertaining to fire protection and emergency services of the city or town are transferred to the fire protection district on its creation date.(2)(a) The city or town fire department must transfer or deliver to the fire protection district:(i) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the city or town fire department pertaining to fire protection and emergency services powers, functions, and duties;(ii) All real property and personal property including cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the city or town fire department in carrying out the fire protection and emergency services powers, functions, and duties; and(iii) All funds, credits, or other assets held by the city or town fire department in connection with fire protection and emergency services powers, functions, and duties.(b) Any appropriations made to the city or town fire department for carrying out the fire protection and emergency services powers, functions, and duties of the city or town must be transferred and credited to the fire protection district.(c) Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred to the fire protection district, the legislative authority of the city or town must make a determination as to the proper allocation.(3) All rules and all pending business before the city or town fire department pertaining to the fire protection and emergency services powers, functions, and duties transferred must be continued and acted upon by the fire protection district, and all existing contracts and obligations remain in full force and must be performed by the fire protection district.(4) The transfer of powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the city or town fire department do not affect the validity of any act performed before creation of the fire protection district.(5) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers, the treasurer for the city or town fire department must certify the apportionments.(6)(a) Subject to (c) of this subsection, all employees of the city or town fire department are transferred to the fire protection district on its creation date. Upon transfer, unless an agreement for different terms of transfer is reached between the collective bargaining representatives of the transferring employees and the fire protection district, an employee is entitled to the employee rights, benefits, and privileges to which he or she would have been entitled as an employee of the city or town fire department, including rights to:(i) Compensation at least equal to the level at the time of transfer;(ii) Retirement, vacation, sick leave, and any other accrued benefit;(iii) Promotion and service time accrual; and(iv) The length or terms of probationary periods, including no requirement for an additional probationary period if one had been completed before the transfer date.(b) If a city or town provides for civil service in its fire department, the collective bargaining representatives of the transferring employees and the fire protection district must negotiate regarding the establishment of a civil service system within the fire protection district.(c) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified as provided by law.(7) A fire protection district formed under RCW 52.02.160 may contract with the city or town for services including but not limited to administrative services such as information technology, financial, and human resources functions.Sec. 1003. RCW 84.55.092 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 309 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The regular property tax levy for each taxing district other than the state's levies may be set at the amount which would be allowed otherwise under this chapter if the regular property tax levy for the district for taxes due in prior years beginning with 1986 had been set at the full amount allowed under this chapter including any levy authorized under RCW 52.16.160 or 52.26.140(1)(c) that would have been imposed but for the limitation in RCW 52.18.065 or 52.26.240, applicable upon imposition of the benefit charge under chapter 52.18 or 52.26 RCW.(2) The purpose of subsection (1) of this section is to remove the incentive for a taxing district to maintain its tax levy at the maximum level permitted under this chapter, and to protect the future levy capacity of a taxing district that reduces its tax levy below the level that it otherwise could impose under this chapter, by removing the adverse consequences to future levy capacities resulting from such levy reductions.(((3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any portion of a city or town's regular property tax levy that has been reduced as part of the formation of a fire protection district under RCW 52.02.160.))Sec. 1004. RCW 84.52.125 and 2017 c 196 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:A fire protection district or regional fire protection service authority created under Title 52 RCW may protect the district's or authority's tax levy from prorationing under RCW 84.52.010(3)(b) by imposing up to a total of twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value of the tax levies authorized under RCW 52.16.140 and 52.16.160, or 52.26.140(1) (b) and (c) outside of the five dollars and ninety cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation limitation established under RCW 84.52.043(2), if those taxes otherwise would be prorated under RCW 84.52.010(3)(b)(vi).Sec. 1005. RCW 52.14.140 and 2017 c 328 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((The))Except as otherwise provided under this section, the members of the legislative authority of a city or town shall serve ex officio, by virtue of their office, as the fire commissioners of a fire protection district created under RCW 52.02.160.(2) The legislative authority of a city or town may, within the initial resolution establishing the district's formation, relinquish governance authority of a fire protection district created under chapter 328, Laws of 2017 to an independently elected board of commissioners to be elected in accordance with RCW 52.14.060.(3)(a) The legislative authority of a city or town may, by a majority vote of its members in an open public meeting, relinquish governance authority of a fire protection district created under chapter 328, Laws of 2017 to an appointed board of three fire commissioners at any time after formation. Each appointed commissioner serves until successors are elected at the next qualified election.At the next qualified election, the person who receives the greatest number of votes for each commissioner position is elected to that position. The terms of office for the initial elected fire commissioners are staggered as follows:(i) The person who is elected receiving the greatest number of votes is elected to a six-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or a five-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year;(ii) The person who is elected receiving the next greatest number of votes is elected to a four-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or a three-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and (iii) The other person who is elected is elected to a two-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The term of office for each subsequent commissioner is six years.(b) If the legislative authority of a city or town relinquishes governance authority of a fire protection district after formation under this section, and that fire protection district maintains a fire department consisting wholly of personnel employed on a full-time, fully paid basis, that district shall have five fire commissioners. The terms of office for the initial elected fire commissioners are staggered as follows:(i) The two people elected receiving the two greatest number of votes are elected to six-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or five-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year;(ii) The two people who are elected receiving the next two greatest number of votes are elected to four-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or three-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and(iii) The other person who is elected is elected to a two-year term of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or a one-year term of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The term of office for each subsequent commissioner is six years.(c) If the legislative authority of a city or town relinquishes governance authority of a fire protection district after formation under this section, and that fire protection district has an annual budget of ten million dollars or more, that district must have seven fire commissioners. The terms of office for the initial elected fire commissioners are staggered as follows:(i) The three people who are elected receiving the three greatest number of votes are elected to six-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or five-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year;(ii) The two people who are elected receiving the next two greatest number of votes are elected to four-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or three-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year; and(iii) The other two people who are elected are elected to two-year terms of office if the election is held in an odd-numbered year, or one-year terms of office if the election is held in an even-numbered year. The term of office for each subsequent commissioner is six years.(4) Except for a city with a population exceeding 500,000, a city or town creating a fire protection district under RCW 52.02.160 after the effective date of this section must provide for the election of an independently elected board of commissioners within two years of the creation of the fire protection district.Part XIMiscellaneousNEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1101. Sections 201 and 202 of this act take effect January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1102. Section 401 of this act expires January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1103. Section 402 of this act takes effect January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1104. Section 403 of this act expires January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1105. Section 404 of this act takes effect January 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1106. Except for sections 201, 202, 402, and 404 of this act, this act takes effect July 1, 2026.--- END ---